Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 17-4-101.
Short
title.

This act may
be cited as the “Wyoming Uniform Securities Act”.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-102.
Definitions.

In this act, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrator” means the secretary of state;

“Agent” means an individual, other than a broker-dealer, who represents a broker-dealer in effecting or attempting to effect purchases or sales of securities or represents an issuer in effecting or attempting to effect purchases or sales of the issuer’s securities. But a partner, officer, or director of a broker-dealer or issuer, or an individual having a similar status or performing similar functions is an agent only if the individual otherwise comes within the term. The term does not include an individual excluded by rule adopted or order issued under this act;

“Bank” means:

A banking institution organized under the laws of the United States;

A member bank of the federal reserve system;

Any other banking institution, whether incorporated or not, doing business under the laws of a state or of the United States, a substantial portion of the business of which consists of receiving deposits or exercising fiduciary powers similar to those permitted to be exercised by national banks under the authority of the comptroller of the currency pursuant to section 1 of Public Law 87-722 (12 U.S.C. § 92a), and which is supervised and examined by a state or federal agency having supervision over banks, and which is not operated for the purpose of evading this act; and

A receiver, conservator, or other liquidating agent of any institution or firm included in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph.

“Broker-dealer” means a person engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities for the account of others or for the person’s own account. The term does not include:

An agent;

An issuer;

A bank or savings institution if its activities as a broker-dealer are limited to those specified in subsections 3(a)(4)(B)(i) through (vi), (viii) through (x), and (xi) if limited to unsolicited transactions; 3(a)(5)(B); and 3(a)(5)(C) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. §§ 78c(a)(4) and (5)) or a bank that satisfies the conditions described in subsection 3(a)(4)(E) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78c(a)(4));

An international banking institution;

A person excluded by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 170, § 4.

“Depository institution” means:

A bank; or

A savings institution, trust company, credit union, or similar institution that is organized or chartered under the laws of a state or of the United States, authorized to receive deposits, and supervised and examined by an official or agency of a state or the United States if its deposits or share accounts are insured to the maximum amount authorized by statute by the federal deposit insurance corporation, the national credit union share insurance fund, or a successor authorized by federal law. The term does not include:

An insurance company or other organization primarily engaged in the business of insurance;

A morris plan bank; or

An industrial loan company that is not an “insured depository institution” as defined in section 3(c)(2) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, (12 U.S.C. 1813(c)(2)), or any successor federal statute.

“Federal covered investment adviser” means a person registered under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940;

“Federal covered security” means a security that is, or upon completion of a transaction will be, a covered security under section 18(b) of the Securities Act of 1933 (15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)) or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to that provision;

“Filing” means the receipt under this act of a record by the secretary of state or a designee of the secretary of state;

“Fraud,” “deceit,” and “defraud” are not limited to common law deceit;

“Guaranteed” means guaranteed as to payment of all principal and all interest;

“Institutional investor” means any of the following, whether acting for itself or for others in a fiduciary capacity:

A depository institution or international banking institution;

An insurance company;

A separate account of an insurance company;

An investment company as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940;

A broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

An employee pension, profit-sharing, or benefit plan if the plan has total assets in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) or its investment decisions are made by a named fiduciary, as defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, that is a broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, an investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, an investment adviser registered under this act, a depository institution, or an insurance company;

A plan established and maintained by a state, a political subdivision of a state, or an agency or instrumentality of a state or a political subdivision of a state for the benefit of its employees, if the plan has total assets in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) or its investment decisions are made by a duly designated public official or by a named fiduciary, as defined in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, that is a broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, an investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, an investment adviser registered under this act, a depository institution, or an insurance company;

A trust, if it has total assets in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00), its trustee is a depository institution, and its participants are exclusively plans of the types identified in subparagraph (F) or (G) of this paragraph, regardless of the size of their assets, except a trust that includes as participants self-directed individual retirement accounts or similar self-directed plans;

An organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), corporation, Massachusetts trust or similar business trust, limited liability company, or partnership, not formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the securities offered, with total assets in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00);

A small business investment company licensed by the small business administration under section 301(c) of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 (15 U.S.C. § 681(c)) with total assets in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00);

A private business development company as defined in section 202(a)(22) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-2(a)(22)) with total assets in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00);

A federal covered investment adviser acting for its own account;

A “qualified institutional buyer” as defined in rule 144A(a)(1), other than rule 144A(a)(1)(i)(H), adopted under the Securities Act of 1933 (17 C.F.R. 230.144A);

A “major United States institutional investor” as defined in rule 15a-6(b)(4)(i) adopted under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (17 C.F.R. 240.15a-6);

Any other person, other than an individual, of institutional character with total assets in excess of ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) not organized for the specific purpose of evading this act; or

Any other person specified by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

“Insurance company” means a company organized as an insurance company whose primary business is writing insurance or reinsuring risks underwritten by insurance companies and which is subject to supervision by the insurance commissioner or a similar official or agency of a state;

“Insured” means insured as to payment of all principal and all interest;

“International banking institution” means an international financial institution of which the United States is a member and whose securities are exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933;

“Investment adviser” means a person that, for compensation, engages in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or that, for compensation and as a part of a regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports concerning securities. The term includes a financial planner or other person that, as an integral component of other financially related services, provides investment advice to others for compensation as part of a business or that holds itself out as providing investment advice to others for compensation. The term does not include:

An investment adviser representative;

A lawyer, accountant, engineer, or teacher whose performance of investment advice is solely incidental to the practice of the person’s profession;

A broker-dealer or its agents whose performance of investment advice is solely incidental to the conduct of business as a broker-dealer and that does not receive special compensation for the investment advice;

A publisher of a bona fide newspaper, news magazine, or business or financial publication of general and regular circulation;

A federal covered investment adviser;

A bank or savings institution;

Any other person that is excluded by the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 from the definition of investment adviser; or

Any other person excluded by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

“Investment adviser representative” means an individual employed by or associated with an investment adviser or federal covered investment adviser and who makes any recommendations or otherwise gives investment advice regarding securities, manages accounts or portfolios of clients, determines which recommendation or advice regarding securities should be given, provides investment advice or holds himself out as providing investment advice, receives compensation to solicit, offer, or negotiate for the sale of or for selling investment advice, or supervises employees who perform any of the foregoing. The term does not include an individual who:

Performs only clerical or ministerial acts;

Is an agent whose performance of investment advice is solely incidental to the individual acting as an agent and who does not receive special compensation for investment advisory services;

Is employed by or associated with a federal covered investment adviser, unless the individual has a “place of business” in this state as that term is defined by rule adopted under section 203A of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-3a) and is:

An “investment adviser representative” as that term is defined by rule adopted under section 203A of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-3a); or

Not a “supervised person” as that term is defined in section 202(a)(25) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. § 80b-2(a)(25)).

Is excluded by rule adopted or order issued under this act.

“Issuer” means a person that issues or proposes to issue a security, subject to the following:

The issuer of a voting trust certificate, collateral trust certificate, certificate of deposit for a security, or share in an investment company without a board of directors or individuals performing similar functions is the person performing the acts and assuming the duties of depositor or manager pursuant to the trust or other agreement or instrument under which the security is issued;

The issuer of an equipment trust certificate or similar security serving the same purpose is the person by which the property is or will be used or to which the property or equipment is or will be leased or conditionally sold or that is otherwise contractually responsible for assuring payment of the certificate;

The issuer of a fractional undivided interest in an oil, gas, or other mineral lease or in payments out of production under a lease, right, or royalty is the owner of an interest in the lease or in payments out of production under a lease, right, or royalty, whether whole or fractional, that creates fractional interests for the purpose of sale.

“Nonissuer transaction” or “nonissuer distribution” means a transaction or distribution not directly or indirectly for the benefit of the issuer;

“Offer to purchase” includes an attempt or offer to obtain, or solicitation of an offer to sell, a security or interest in a security for value. The term does not include a tender offer that is subject to section 14(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. 78n(d));

“Person” means an individual; corporation; business trust; estate; trust; partnership; limited liability company; association; joint venture; government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Place of business” of a broker-dealer, an investment adviser, or a federal covered investment adviser means:

An office at which the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser regularly provides brokerage or investment advice or solicits, meets with, or otherwise communicates with customers or clients; or

Any other location that is held out to the general public as a location at which the broker-dealer, investment adviser, or federal covered investment adviser provides brokerage or investment advice or solicits, meets with, or otherwise communicates with customers or clients.

“Predecessor act” means the act repealed and replaced by this act;

“Price amendment” means the amendment to a registration statement filed under the Securities Act of 1933 or, if an amendment is not filed, the prospectus or prospectus supplement filed under the Securities Act of 1933 that includes a statement of the offering price, underwriting and selling discounts or commissions, amount of proceeds, conversion rates, call prices, and other matters dependent upon the offering price;

“Principal place of business” of a broker-dealer or an investment adviser means the executive office of the broker-dealer or investment adviser from which the officers, partners, or managers of the broker-dealer or investment adviser direct, control, and coordinate the activities of the broker-dealer or investment adviser;

“Record,” except in the phrases “of record,” “official record,” and “public record,” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Sale” includes every contract of sale, contract to sell, or disposition of, a security or interest in a security for value, and “offer to sell” includes every attempt or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an offer to purchase, a security or interest in a security for value. Both terms include:

A security given or delivered with, or as a bonus on account of, a purchase of securities or any other thing constituting part of the subject of the purchase and having been offered and sold for value;

A gift of assessable stock involving an offer and sale; and

A sale or offer of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of the same or another issuer and a sale or offer of a security that gives the holder a present or future right or privilege to convert the security into another security of the same or another issuer, including an offer of the other security.

“Securities and exchange commission” means the United States securities and exchange commission;

“Security” means a note; stock; treasury stock; security future; bond; debenture; evidence of indebtedness; certificate of interest or participation in a profit–sharing agreement; collateral trust certificate; preorganization certificate or subscription; transferable share; investment contract; voting trust certificate; certificate of deposit for a security; put, call, straddle, option, or privilege on a security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of securities, including an interest therein or based on the value thereof; put, call, straddle, option, or privilege entered into on a national securities exchange relating to foreign currency; or, in general, an interest or instrument commonly known as a “security”; or a certificate of interest or participation in, temporary or interim certificate for, receipt for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase, any of the foregoing. The term:

Includes both a certificated and an uncertificated security;

Does not include an insurance or endowment policy or annuity contract under which an insurance company promises to pay a fixed or variable sum of money either in a lump sum or periodically for life or other specified period;

Does not include an interest in a contributory or noncontributory pension or welfare plan subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974;

Includes as an “investment contract” an investment in a common enterprise with the expectation of profits to be derived primarily from the efforts of a person other than the investor and a “common enterprise” means an enterprise in which the fortunes of the investor are interwoven with those of either the person offering the investment, a third party, or other investors;

Includes as an “investment contract,” among other contracts, an interest in a limited partnership and a limited liability company and an investment in a viatical settlement or similar agreement.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 170, § 4.

“Self-regulatory organization” means a national securities exchange registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, a national securities association of broker-dealers registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, a clearing agency registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or the municipal securities rulemaking board established under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“This act” means W.S.

17-4-101

through

17-4-701

.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 44, § 2, effective March 10, 2018; 2019 ch. 170, §§ 3, 4, effective February 28, 2019; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 170 § 3, in the introductory language in (a)(xvii), deleted “W.S. 17-4-206(a) and (c) and.”

Laws 2019, ch. 170, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 170, § 4, repealed (a)(iv)(F), which read: “A person who facilitates the exchange of an open blockchain token, as defined in W.S. 17-4-206(e) and subject to W.S. 17-4-206(c),” and (a)(xxviii)(F), which read: “Does not include an open blockchain token, as defined in W.S. 17-4-206(e), except as provided by that section.”

Laws 2019, ch. 170, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, at the end of (a)(iv)(E) and (a)(xxviii)(E) made stylistic changes.

Editor's Notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Investment seller obligated to know what constitutes “security.”
—

When any person undertakes to sell an investment, he is obligated to know the law surrounding such transactions and what is and what is not a “security.” Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

Investment document is “security.” —

Gaudina v. Haberman, 644 P.2d 159,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Securities — Oil and Gas Leases: Should They be Considered Securities? Shepperd v. Boettcher & Co., 613 F. Supp. 287, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17830 (D. Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Partnership and joint venture interests as securities within meaning of federal Securities Act of 1933 (15 USC § 77a et seq.) and Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78a et seq.), 58 ALR Fed 408.

Commodity futures contract or account as included in meaning of “security” as defined in § 3(a)(10) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78c(a)(10)), 58 ALR Fed 616.

“Risk capital” test for determination of whether transaction involves security, within meaning of federal Securities Act of 1933 (15 USC § 77a et seq.) and Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78a et seq.), 68 ALR Fed 89.

Certificate of deposit as “security” under federal securities laws, 82 ALR Fed 553.

“Common enterprise” element of Howey test to determine existence of investment contract regulable as “security” within meaning of federal Securities Act of 1988 (15 USC § 77a et seq.) and Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 USC § 78a et seq.), 90 ALR Fed 825.

§ 17-4-103.
References
to federal statutes.

As used in this
act: “Securities Act of 1933” (15 U.S.C. § 77a
et seq.), “Securities Exchange Act of 1934” (15 U.S.C.
§ 78a et seq.), “Public Utility Holding Company Act of
1935” (15 U.S.C. § 79 et seq.), “Investment Company
Act of 1940” (15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.), “Investment
Advisers Act of 1940” (15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq.), “Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974” (29 U.S.C. § 1001
et seq.), “National Housing Act” (12 U.S.C. § 1701
et seq.), “Commodity Exchange Act” (7 U.S.C. §
1 et seq.), “Internal Revenue Code” (26 U.S.C. §
1 et seq.), “Securities Investor Protection Act of 1970”
(15 U.S.C. § 78aaa et seq.), “Securities Litigation Uniform
Standards Act of 1998” (112 Stat. 3227), “Small Business
Investment Act of 1958” (15 U.S.C. § 661 et seq.), and
“Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act”
(15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.) mean those statutes and the rules
and regulations adopted under those statutes, as in effect on the
date of enactment of this act.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-104.
References
to federal agencies.

A reference in
this act to an agency or department of the United States is also a
reference to a successor agency or department.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 17-4-105.
Electronic records and signatures; applicability.

This act modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)). This act authorizes the filing of records and signatures, when specified by provisions of this act or by a rule adopted or order issued under this act, in a manner consistent with section 104(a) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7004(a)).

The Financial Technology Sandbox Act shall apply to this act.

History.

2016 ch. 22, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); and added (b).